Utah statutes.
31A-8-502.   Court ordered coverage for minor children who reside outside
the service area.
(1) (a)  The requirements of Subsection (2) apply to a health maintenance
organization if the health maintenance organization plan:
(i)  restricts coverage for nonemergency services to services provided by
contracted providers within the organization's service area; and
(ii)  does not offer a benefit that permits members the option of obtaining
covered services from a non-contracted provider.
(b)  The requirements of Subsection (2) do not apply to a health maintenance
organization if:
(i)  the child that is the subject of a court or administrative support order
is over the age of 18 and is no longer enrolled in high school; or
(ii)  a parent's employer offers the parent a choice to select health
insurance coverage that is not a health maintenance organization plan either
at the time of the court or administrative support order, or at a subsequent
open enrollment period.  This exemption from Subsection (2) applies even if
the parent ultimately chooses the health maintenance organization plan.
(2)  If a parent is required by a court or administrative support order to
provide health insurance coverage for a child who resides outside of a health
maintenance organization's service area, the health maintenance organization
shall:
(a)  comply with the provisions of Section 31A-22-610.5;
(b)  allow the enrollee parent to enroll the child on the organization plan;
(c)  pay for otherwise covered health care services rendered to the child
outside of the service area by a noncontracted provider:
(i)  if the child, noncustodial parent, or custodial parent has complied with
prior authorization or utilization review otherwise required by the
organization; and
(ii)  in an amount equal to the dollar amount the organization pays under a
noncapitated arrangement for comparable services to a contracting provider in
the same class of health care providers as the provider who rendered the
services; and
(d)  make payments on claims submitted in accordance with Subsection (2)(c)
directly to the provider, custodial parent, the child who obtained benefits,
or state Medicaid agency.
(3) (a)  The parents of the child who is the subject of the court or
administrative support order are responsible for any charges billed by the
provider in excess of those paid by the organization.
(b)  This section does not affect any court or administrative order regarding
the responsibilities between the parents to pay any medical expenses not
covered by accident and health insurance or a health maintenance organization
plan.
(4)  The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this
section and Section 31A-22-610.5.
